Utah statutes.
70A-2a-201.   Statute of frauds.
(1)  A lease contract is not enforceable by way of action or defense unless:
(a)  in a lease contract that is not a consumer lease, the total payments to
be made under the lease contract, excluding payments for options to renew or
buy, are less than $1,000; or
(b)  there is a writing, signed by the party against whom enforcement is
sought or by that party's authorized agent, sufficient to indicate that a
lease contract has been made between the parties and to describe the goods
leased and the lease term.
(2)  Any description of leased goods or of the lease term is sufficient and
satisfies Subsection (1)(b), whether or not it is specific, if it reasonably
identifies what is described.
(3)  A writing is not insufficient because it omits or incorrectly states a
term agreed upon, but the lease contract is not enforceable under Subsection
(1)(b) beyond the lease term and the quantity of goods shown in the writing.
(4)  A lease contract that does not satisfy the requirements of Subsection
(1), but which is valid in other respects, is enforceable:
(a)  if the goods are to be specially manufactured or obtained for the lessee
and are not suitable for lease or sale to others in the ordinary course of the
lessor's business, and the lessor, before notice of repudiation is received
and under circumstances that reasonably indicate that the goods are for the
lessee, has made either a substantial beginning of their manufacture or
commitments for their procurement;
(b)  if the party against whom enforcement is sought admits in that party's
pleading, testimony, or otherwise in court that a lease contract was made, but
the lease contract is not enforceable under this provision beyond the quantity
of goods admitted; or
(c)  with respect to goods that have been received and accepted by the lessee.
(5)  The lease term under a lease contract referred to in Subsection (4) is
enforceable:
(a)  if there is a writing signed by the party against whom enforcement is
sought or by that party's authorized agent specifying the lease term, the term
so specified;
(b)  if the party against whom enforcement is sought admits in that party's
pleading, testimony, or otherwise in court a lease term, the term so admitted;
or
(c)  if there is a reasonable lease term.
